California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 shall establish the minimum criteria for the curriculum of nonboard-approved programs. Additionally, the board shall notify those programs only if the program’s curriculum does not meet established minimum criteria, as established for board-approved registered dental assistant programs, except any requirement that the program be given in a postsecondary institution. Graduates of programs not meeting established minimum criteria shall not qualify for satisfactory work experience as defined by this section.

(c) In addition to the requirements specified in subdivision (a), individuals applying for registered dental assistant licensure shall provide written evidence of successful completion of all of the following:

(1) Within two years before the date of the application received by the board:

(A) A board-approved
 two-hour course in the Dental Practice Act.

(B) A board-approved eight-hour course in infection control.

(2) Within five years before the date of the application received by the board:

(A) A board-approved course in pit and fissure sealants.

(B) A board-approved course in coronal polishing.

(3) Within 10 years before the date of the application received by the board, a board-approved course in radiation safety.

(4) Current certification in basic life support issued by American Red Cross, American Heart Association, American Safety and Health Institute, American Dental Association’s Continuing Education Recognition Program, or
 Academy of General Dentistry’s Program Approval for Continuing Education.

(5) Satisfactory performance on the Registered Dental Assistant Combined Written and Law and Ethics Examination administered by the board.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, individuals with current and active California licensure as a registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions whose initial license was issued on or after January 1, 2006, applying for licensure as a registered dental assistant shall comply with this subdivision and satisfy all of the following:

(1) File an application with the board and pay the applicable fee.

(2) Submit evidence of current
 certification in basic life support issued by American Red Cross, American Heart Association, American Safety and Health Institute, American Dental Association’s Continuing Education Recognition Program, or Academy of General Dentistry’s Program Approval for Continuing Education.

(3) Demonstrate satisfactory performance on the Registered Dental Assistant Combined Written and Law and Ethics Examination administered by the board.

(e) Individuals applying for registered dental assistant licensure shall submit a full set of fingerprints for purposes of conducting a criminal history record check.

(f) A registered dental assistant with permits in either orthodontic assisting or dental sedation assisting shall be referred to as an “RDA with orthodontic assistant permit,” or “RDA with dental sedation assistant permit,” as
 applicable. These terms shall be used for reference purposes only and do not create additional categories of licensure.

(g) Completion of the continuing education requirements established by the board pursuant to Section 1645 by a registered dental assistant who also holds a permit as an orthodontic assistant or dental sedation assistant shall fulfill the continuing education requirements for the permit or permits.

(h) The Registered Dental Assistant Combined Written and Law and Ethics Examination required by this section shall comply with Section 139.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 54) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 55.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.4.

(a) A registered dental assistant may perform all of the following duties and procedures of a dental assistant as specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 1750.1 and may perform all the following duties under the general supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist:

(1) All duties that a dental assistant is allowed to perform.

(2) Mouth-mirror inspections of the oral cavity, to include charting of obvious lesions, existing restorations, and missing teeth.

(3) Apply and activate bleaching agents using a nonlaser
 light-curing device.

(4) Use of automated caries detection devices and materials and recording of such findings before placement of pit and fissure sealants.

(5) Obtain intraoral images for computer-aided design (CAD), milled restorations.

(6) Pulp vitality testing and recording of findings.

(7) Place bases, liners, etch, and bonding agents for restorative procedures.

(8) Chemically prepare teeth for bonding for restorative procedures.

(9) Place, adjust, and finish direct provisional restorations.

(10) Fabricate, adjust, cement, and remove indirect provisional
 restorations, including stainless steel crowns when used as a provisional restoration.

(11) Place post-extraction dressings after inspection of the surgical site by the supervising licensed dentist.

(12) Place periodontal dressings.

(13) Dry endodontically treated canals using absorbent paper points.

(14) Perform sore-spot adjustment only of dentures extraorally.

(15) Perform tissue conditioning and soft reline of dentures. 

(16) Remove excess cement from surfaces of teeth with a hand instrument.

(17) Polish coronal surfaces of the teeth.

(18) Place ligature ties and archwires.

(19) All duties that the board may prescribe by regulation.

(b) A registered dental assistant may only perform the following additional duties after successfully completing a board-approved registered dental assistant educational program or board-approved course in those duties.

(1) Remove excess cement with an ultrasonic scaler from supragingival surfaces of teeth undergoing orthodontic treatment.

(2) The allowable duties of an orthodontic assistant permitholder as specified in Section 1750.3. A registered dental assistant shall not be required to complete further instruction in the duties of placing ligature ties and archwires, removing orthodontic
 bands, and removing excess cement from tooth surfaces with a hand instrument.

(3) The allowable duties of a dental sedation assistant permitholder as specified in Section 1750.5.

(4) The application of pit and fissure sealants.

(c) Except as provided in Section 1777, the supervising licensed dentist shall be responsible for ensuring completion of courses to perform additional duties and determining whether each authorized procedure performed by a registered dental assistant should be performed under general or direct supervision.

(d) The supervising dentist shall be responsible for determining whether each authorized procedure in subdivision (a) performed by a registered dental assistant should be performed under general or direct supervision.

(e) A registered dental assistant may perform the following duties under direct supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist:

(1) Isolate, etch, bond, and attach composite buttons for orthodontic procedures.

(2) Size, fit, secure, and remove orthodontic bands using appropriate dental materials.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a registered dental assistant may perform a duty specified in this section using contemporary techniques and materials designed for use in the performance of that duty under the direct supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist if the registered dental assistant has completed the appropriate education and
 training, and whose skill, knowledge, and education in the use of such contemporary technique or material has been determined clinically competent by the supervising licensed dentist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 56.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.6.

A registered dental assistant licensed on and after January 1, 2010, shall provide evidence of successful completion of a board-approved course in the application of pit and fissure sealants prior to the first expiration of his or her license that requires the completion of continuing education as a condition of renewal. The license of a registered dental assistant who does not provide evidence of successful completion of that course shall not be renewed until evidence of course completion is provided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 499, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.

(a) On and after January 1, 2010, the board may license as a registered dental assistant in extended functions a person who files a completed application, pays the applicable fee, and submits written evidence, satisfactory to the board, of all of the following eligibility requirements:

(1) Current, active, and valid licensure as a registered dental assistant.

(2) A full set of fingerprints for purposes of conducting a criminal history check.

(3) Successful completion of either of the following:

(A) An extended functions postsecondary program approved by the board in all of
 the procedures specified in Section 1753.5.

(B) An extended functions postsecondary program approved by the board to teach the duties that registered dental assistants in extended functions were allowed to perform pursuant to board regulations prior to January 1, 2010, and a course approved by the board in the procedures specified in paragraphs (1), (2), (5), and (7) to (11), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 1753.5.

(4) Current certification in basic life support issued by American Red Cross, American Heart Association, American Safety and Health Institute, American Dental Association’s Continuing Education Provider Recognition Program, or Academy of General Dentistry’s Program Approval for Continuing Education.

(5) Successful completion of a board-approved pit and fissure sealant course. 

(6) Passage of a written examination administered by the board. The board shall designate whether the written examination shall be administered by the board.

(b) A registered dental assistant in extended functions with permits in either orthodontic assisting or dental sedation assisting shall be referred to as an “RDAEF with orthodontic assistant permit,” or “RDAEF with dental sedation assistant permit,” as applicable. These terms shall be used for reference purposes only and do not create additional categories of licensure.

(c) Completion of the continuing education requirements established by the board pursuant to Section 1645 by a registered dental assistant in extended functions who also holds a permit as an orthodontic assistant or dental sedation assistant shall fulfill the continuing education requirement for
 such permit or permits.

(d) The licensee shall be responsible for complying with all applicable licensure renewal requirements, including continuing education pursuant to Section 1645.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 57.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.5.

(a) A registered dental assistant in extended functions licensed on or after January 1, 2010, is authorized to perform all duties and procedures that a registered dental assistant is authorized to perform as specified in and limited by Section 1752.4, and the duties in this section.

(b) A registered dental assistant in extended functions licensed on or after January 1, 2010, is authorized to perform the following additional procedures under direct supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist:

(1) Perform oral health assessments, including intraoral and extraoral soft tissue evaluations to identify
 oral lesions, classifying occlusion, performing myofunctional evaluations, and oral cancer screenings as authorized by the supervising dentist.

(2) Perform oral health assessments in school-based, community health project settings under the direction of a dentist, registered dental hygienist, or registered dental hygienist in alternative practice.

(3) Gingival retraction for impression and restorative procedures.

(4) Size and fit endodontic master points and accessory points.

(5) Cement endodontic master points and accessory points.

(6) Perform post, core, and build-up procedures in conjunction with direct and indirect restorations.

(7) Take final impression for permanent indirect restorations.

(8) Take final impressions for tooth-borne removeable prosthesis.

(9) Place, contour, finish, and adjust all direct restorations.

(10) Adjust and adhere all permanent indirect restorations.

(11) Other procedures authorized by regulations adopted by the board.

(c) A registered dental assistant in extended functions licensed on or after January 1, 2010, may perform a duty specified in this section using contemporary techniques and materials designed for use in the performance of that duty under the direct supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full
 professional responsibility of a licensed dentist if the registered dental assistant in extended functions has completed the appropriate education and training, and whose skill, knowledge, and education in the use of such contemporary technique or material has been determined clinically competent by the supervising licensed dentist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 58.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.51.

(a) Unless otherwise specified in this section, a registered dental assistant in extended functions licensed on or after January 1, 2010, who successfully completes a board-approved course in interim therapeutic restoration and radiographic decisionmaking, is authorized to perform the following enhanced duties pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of the supervising licensed dentist:

(1) Under general supervision, determine which radiographs to perform on a patient who has not received an initial examination by the supervising dentist for the specific purpose of the dentist making a diagnosis and treatment plan for the patient. The registered dental assistant in extended functions shall follow protocols
 established by the supervising dentist.

(2) Under direct supervision, place interim therapeutic restorations to stabilize the tooth until a licensed dentist diagnoses the need for further definitive treatment.

(b) Place interim therapeutic restorations after the supervising dentist confirms a diagnosis and provides instruction to perform the procedure in the following settings:

(1) In a dental office setting, under the direct or general supervision of a dentist.

(2) In public health settings, using telehealth, as defined by Section 2290.5, for the purpose of communication with the supervising dentist, including, but not limited to, schools, Head Start and preschool programs, and community clinics, under the general supervision of a dentist.

(c) The board shall identify, on the statewide license verification internet website, the enhanced duty of interim therapeutic restoration for a registered dental assistant in extended functions who files a completed verification form issued by the board including the applicable fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 59.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.52.

(a) On or after January 1, 2026, a provider of a course for instruction in interim therapeutic restorations and radiographic decisionmaking for a registered dental assistant in extended functions shall apply for board approval to offer the course and submit all of the following to the board:

(1) An application prescribed by the board that shall specify the name of the course or educational program administrator or director, the name of the course provider, the name of the course, and the location where the course will be offered.

(2) The application fee prescribed by regulation.

(3) A detailed course curriculum
 evidencing that the course is sufficient in length for the students to develop competency in placement of protective restorations, but shall be, at a minimum, 16 hours in length and include all of the following:

(A) Four hours of didactic training, which may take place in an in-person or online environment, and shall include:

(i) Review of pulpal anatomy.

(ii) Theory of adhesive restorative materials used in the placement of adhesive protective restorations, including mechanisms of bonding to tooth structure, handling characteristics of the materials, preparation of the tooth prior to material placement, and placement techniques.

(iii) Criteria used in clinical dentistry pertaining to the use and placement of adhesive protective restorations, which
 shall include:

(I) Patient factors, as follows:

(ia) According to the American Society of Anesthesiologists Physical Status Classification, the patient is Class III or less.

(ib) The patient is cooperative enough to have the interim therapeutic restoration placed without the need for special protocols, including sedation or physical support.

(ic) The patient, or responsible party, has provided consent for the interim therapeutic restoration procedure.

(id) The patient reports that the tooth is asymptomatic, or if there is mild sensitivity that stops within a few seconds of the removal of the offending stimulus.

(II) Tooth
 factors, as follows:

(ia) The lesion is accessible without the need for creating access using a dental handpiece.

(ib) The margins of the lesion are accessible so that clean, noninvolved margins can be obtained around the entire periphery of the lesion with the use of hand instrumentation.

(ic) The depth of the lesion is more than two millimeters from the pulp on radiographic examination or is judged by the supervising licensed dentist to be a shallow lesion such that the treatment does not endanger the pulp or require the use of local anesthetic.

(id) The tooth is restorable and does not have other significant pathology.

(iv) The protocols to deal with adverse outcomes used in the
 placement of adhesive protective restorations, including mechanisms of bonding to tooth structure, handling characteristics of the materials, preparation of the tooth prior to material placement, and placement techniques.

(v) Criteria for evaluating successful completion of adhesive protective restorations, including, but not limited to, restorative material not in hyper occlusion, no marginal voids, and minimal excess material.

(vi) Protocols for adverse outcomes after interim therapeutic restoration placement, including, but not limited to, exposed pulp, tooth fracture, gingival tissue injury, high occlusion, open margins, tooth sensitivity, rough surface, complications, or unsuccessful completion of adhesive protective restorations, including situations requiring immediate referral to a dentist.

(vii) Protocols
 for followup of adhesive protective restorations, including, but not limited to, at least two followup examinations of the interim therapeutic restoration within a 12-month period.

(B) Four hours of laboratory training, which shall be held at a physical facility, and include placement of 10 adhesive protective restorations where students demonstrate competency in this technique on typodont teeth.

(C) Eight hours of clinical training, which shall be held at a physical facility, and include experiences where students demonstrate, at minimum, placement of five interim therapeutic restorations under direct supervision of faculty.

(4) A detailed course curriculum evidencing that the course is sufficient in length for the students to develop competency in making decisions about which radiographs to expose to facilitate
 diagnosis and treatment planning by a dentist, but shall be, at a minimum, four hours in length and include all of the following:

(A) Didactic instruction, including all of the following:

(i) The concept of managing caries and individualizing treatment based on a caries risk assessment.

(ii) Guidelines for radiographic decisionmaking, including, but not limited to, both of the following concepts:

(I) The American Dental Association’s Dental Radiographic Examinations: Recommendations for Patient Selection and Limiting Radiation Exposure (Revised 2012).

(II) The American Academy of Pediatric Dentistry’s Guidelines on Prescribing Dental Radiographs.

(iii) The guidelines developed by Pacific Center for Special Care at the University of the Pacific Arthur A. Dugoni School of Dentistry (Pacific) for use in training for Health and Workforce Pilot Project No. 172, including both of the following:

(I) Instruction on specific decisionmaking guidelines that incorporate information about the patient’s health, radiographic history, time span since previous radiographs were taken, and availability of previous radiographs.

(II) Instruction pertaining to the general condition of the mouth, including the extent of dental restorations present and visible signs of abnormalities, including broken teeth, dark areas, holes in teeth, demineralization, visible carious lesions, and remineralization.

(B) Laboratory training
 that includes case-based examination with various clinical situations where trainees make decisions about which radiographs to expose and demonstrate competency to faculty based on these case studies.

(C) Simulated clinical experiences consisting of a review of various clinical cases with instructor-led discussion about radiographic decisionmaking in these clinical situations.

(5) Evidence of student access to adequate equipment and facilities to satisfy the educational requirements as specified in this section.

(6) Evidence that the physical facilities required under this section have all of the following:

(A) A patient clinic area, laboratory, and radiology area.

(B) Access to equipment
 necessary to develop dental assisting skills in radiographic decisionmaking.

(C) Infection control equipment as required by the board.

(7) Evidence that the physical facilities and equipment are maintained and replaced in a manner designed to provide students with a course that will meet the educational objectives set forth in this section.

(8) Evidence that all students have access to all of the following:

(A) A hazardous waste management plan for the disposal of needles, cartridges, medical waste, and storage of oxygen and nitrous oxide tanks.

(B) A clinic hazard communication plan.

(C) A copy of the course’s bloodborne and
 infectious diseases exposure control plan, which shall include emergency needlestick information.

(9) Written clinical and laboratory protocols to ensure adequate asepsis, infection and hazard control, and disposal of hazardous wastes, which shall comply with the board’s regulations and other federal, state, and local requirements. The course provider shall provide such protocols to all students, faculty, and appropriate staff to assure compliance with such protocols. Adequate space shall be provided for preparing and sterilizing all armamentaria.

(10) Evidence that the course is established at the postsecondary educational level.

(b) The course content may be incorporated into a current registered dental assistant in extended functions program.

(c) For
 course enrollment, the course provider shall ensure submission by the student of satisfactory evidence of both of the following requirements:

(1) A current, active license as a registered dental assistant in extended functions issued on or after January 1, 2010.

(2) A current certification in basic life support from American Red Cross, American Heart Association, American Safety and Health Institute, American Dental Association’s Continuing Education Recognition Program, or Academy of General Dentistry’s Program Approval for Continuing Education.

(d) The program or course director shall do both of the following:

(1) Ensure all faculty involved in clinical evaluation of students maintain currency in evaluation protocols for interim therapeutic
 restoration placement and radiographic decisionmaking.

(2) Ensure that all faculty responsible for clinical evaluation have completed a one-hour methodology course in clinical evaluation for interim therapeutic restoration placement and radiographic decisionmaking before instruction.

(e) Satisfactory completion of a course in interim therapeutic restoration and radiographic decisionmaking is determined using criteria-referenced completion standards, where the instructor determines when the trainee has achieved competency based on these standards, but trainees take varying amounts of time to achieve competency. Any student who does not achieve competency in this duty in the specified period of instruction may receive additional training and evaluation. In cases where, in the judgment of the faculty, students are not making adequate progress, they shall be discontinued from the
 program.

(f) Each student shall pass a written examination which reflects the entire curriculum content.

(g) Each student shall pass a simulated clinical examination in which the student successfully completes the application of three of the five interim therapeutic restoration placements required for clinical instruction under faculty supervision.

(h) Each approved course shall be subject to board review at any time for compliance with the requirements under this section. The board may withdraw approval at any time that it determines that the course does not meet the requirements set forth in this section.

(i) The program or course director shall be responsible for notifying the board in writing of any changes to the course content, physical
 facilities, and faculty within 10 days of such changes.

(j) The board may adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 60.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.55.

(a) A registered dental assistant in extended functions is authorized to perform the additional duties as set forth in subdivision (b) pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a supervising dentist, if the licensee meets one of the following requirements:

(1) Is licensed on or after January 1, 2010.

(2) Is licensed before January 1, 2010, and has successfully completed a board-approved course in the additional procedures specified in Section 1753.5.

(b) (1) Determine which radiographs to perform on a patient who has not received an initial examination by the supervising dentist for
 the specific purpose of the dentist making a diagnosis and treatment plan for the patient. In these circumstances, the dental assistant in extended functions shall follow protocols established by the supervising dentist. This paragraph only applies in the following settings:

(A) In a dental office setting.

(B) In public health settings, using telehealth, as defined by Section 2290.5, for the purpose of communication with the supervising dentist, including, but not limited to, schools, Head Start and preschool programs, and community clinics, under the general supervision of a dentist.

(2) Place protective restorations, which for this purpose are identified as interim therapeutic restorations, and defined as a direct provisional restoration placed to stabilize the tooth until a licensed dentist diagnoses the need for
 further definitive treatment. An interim therapeutic restoration consists of the removal of soft material from the tooth using only hand instrumentation, without the use of rotary instrumentation, and subsequent placement of an adhesive restorative material. Local anesthesia shall not be necessary for interim therapeutic restoration placement. Interim therapeutic restorations shall be placed only in accordance with both of the following:

(A) In either of the following settings:

(i) In a dental office setting, under the direct or general supervision of a dentist as determined by the dentist.

(ii) In public health settings, using telehealth, as defined by Section 2290.5, for the purpose of communication with the supervising dentist, including, but not limited to, schools, Head Start and preschool programs, and
 community clinics, under the general supervision of a dentist.

(B) After the diagnosis, treatment plan, and instruction to perform the procedure provided by a dentist.

(c) The functions described in subdivision (b) may be performed by a registered dental assistant in extended functions only after completion of a program that includes training in performing those functions, or after providing evidence, satisfactory to the board, of having completed a board-approved course in those functions.

(d) The board may issue a permit to a registered dental assistant in extended functions who files a completed application, including the fee, to provide the duties specified in this section after the board has determined the registered dental assistant in extended functions has completed the coursework required in subdivision
 (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 61.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.6.

Each person who holds a license as a registered dental assistant in extended functions on the operative date of this section may only perform those procedures that a registered dental assistant is allowed to perform as specified in and limited by Section 1752.4, and the procedures specified in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, until the person provides evidence of having completed a board-approved course in the additional procedures specified in Sections 1753.5 and 1753.55:

(a) Gingiva retraction for impression and restorative procedures.

(b) Take final impressions for permanent direct and indirect restorations.

(c) Apply pit and fissure sealants.

(d) Remove excess cement from subgingival tooth surfaces with a hand instrument.

(e) Fit trial endodontic filling points.

(f) Formulate indirect patterns for post and core castings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 62.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1754.5.

(a) A radiation safety course shall have the primary purpose of providing theory, laboratory, and clinical application in radiographic techniques. The board shall approve only those courses that adhere to the minimum requirements of this section.

(b) A radiation safety course provider applying for initial board approval shall submit a completed application for course approval, on a form provided by the board, accompanied by the applicable fee. The board may approve or deny approval after it evaluates all components of the course.

(c) Continuation of approval will be contingent upon continued compliance with Sections 1070 and 1070.1 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations
 and all requirements set forth in this section. The board may withdraw approval at any time that it determines that the course does not meet the requirements set forth in this subdivision.

(d) Providers shall make adequate provisions for appropriate supervision, operation, and facilities when used for laboratory and preclinical instruction.

(e) A course in radiation safety shall be of sufficient duration for the student to achieve minimum competence, but in no event less than 32 hours, including at least 8 hours of didactic instruction, at least 12 hours of laboratory instruction, and at least 12 hours of supervised clinical instruction.

(f) A course shall establish specific instructional objectives. The theoretical aspects of the course shall provide the content necessary for students to make safe and ethical
 judgments regarding radiation safety.

(g) Objective evaluation criteria shall be used for measuring student progress. Students shall be provided with specific performance objectives and the evaluation criteria that will be used for all evaluation and testing procedures.

(h) Areas of didactic instruction shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Radiation physics and biology.

(2) Radiation protection and safety.

(3) Recognition of normal intraoral and extraoral anatomical landmarks.

(4) Radiograph exposure and processing techniques.

(5) Radiograph
 mounting or sequencing, and viewing, including anatomical landmarks of the oral cavity.

(6) Intraoral techniques including holding devices and image receptors.

(7) Proper use of patient protection devices and personal protective equipment for operator use.

(8) Identification and correction of faulty radiographs.

(9) Introduction to contemporary equipment and devices including the use of computerized digital radiography and extraoral imaging that may include panographs or cone-beam imaging.

(10) Techniques and exposure guidelines for a variety of patients including, but not limited to, adult, pediatric, edentulous, partially edentulous, endodontic, and patients with special needs.

(11) Radiographic record management.

(i) For the student to achieve minimum competence in the application of dental radiographic techniques and radiation safety, all the following shall be met by a board-approved course:

(1) Successful completion of laboratory experiences consisting of at least two bitewing radiographic series and two full mouth intraoral radiographic series using an x-ray training mannequin designed for radiographic exposures utilizing any dental radiographic image receptor or device deemed appropriate by the course director.

(2) Successful completion of clinical experiences consisting of at least three full-mouth intraoral radiographic series using any dental radiographic image receptor or device deemed appropriate by the course director
 or supervising dentist.

(j) All clinical radiographs shall be made using diagnostic criteria established by the course of instruction and shall in no event exceed three reexposures per series.

(k) Before the student’s performance of procedures on patients, the student shall provide evidence to the radiation safety course provider of having completed a board-approved eight-hour course in infection control and current, valid certification in basic life support.

(l) Completion of student and instructor written evaluations of each radiographic series identifying errors, causes of error, correction of errors, and, if applicable, the number of reexposures necessary for successful completion of a series to clinical competency.

(m) The student shall
 successfully complete a comprehensive written exam prior to the completion of the course. The exam shall include questions specific to items addressed in Article 4 (commencing with Section 30305) of Group 3 of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 5 of Division 1 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations relative to the special requirements for the use of x-ray in the healing arts.

(n) Extramural dental facilities may be utilized by a course for the purposes of clinical experiences. Clinical oversight shall be performed under the general supervision of a licensed dentist who shall authorize the student to perform, at minimum, three radiographic series. Didactic and laboratory instruction shall be provided only by course faculty or instructional staff prior to clinical performances.

(o) Programs and courses using extramural dental faculties for dental radiographic clinical experiences
 shall provide to the board, upon request or renewal of provider status, copies of all contracts of affiliation and documentation demonstrating compliance with board regulations.

(p) Upon successful completion of the course, students shall receive a certificate of completion as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 1741.

(q) The board may adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 64.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1755.

(a) A course in infection control is one that has as its main purpose providing theory and clinical application in infection control practices and principles where the protection of the public is its primary focus.

(b) An unlicensed dental assistant not enrolled in a board-approved program for registered dental assisting or an alternative dental assisting program as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1741, shall successfully complete either the Dental Assisting National Board’s Infection Control examination or one of the following infection control certification courses:

(1) A board-approved eight-hour infection control
 course provided by a board-approved registered dental assisting education program.

(2) A board-approved eight-hour infection control course pursuant to Section 1070.6 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding Sections 1070, 1070.1, and 1070.6 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, a course with at least four hours of didactic instruction, as described in subdivision (e), and at least two hours of laboratory instruction using video or a series of video training tools, all of which may be delivered using asynchronous, synchronous, or online learning mechanisms or a combination thereof, offered by the California Dental Association or a provider approved by the California Dental Association, the American
 Dental Association’s Continuing Education Recognition Program, or the Academy of General Dentistry’s Program Approval for Continuing Education.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “laboratory instruction” means instruction in which students perform procedures using study models, mannequins, or other simulation methods.

(c) A course shall establish specific instructional objectives. Instruction shall provide the content necessary for students to make safe and ethical judgments regarding infection control and asepsis.

(d) Objective evaluation criteria shall be used for measuring student progress. Students shall be provided with specific performance objectives and the evaluation criteria that will be used for didactic
 testing.

(e) Didactic instruction shall include, at a minimum, all of the following as they relate to Cal/OSHA regulations, as set forth in Sections 300 to 344.85, inclusive, of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, and the board’s Minimum Standards for Infection Control, as set forth in Section 1005 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations:

(1) Basic dental science and microbiology as they relate to infection control in dentistry.

(2) Legal and ethical aspects of infection control procedures.

(3) Terms and protocols specified in Section 1005 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations regarding the minimum standards for infection
 control.

(4) Principles of modes of disease transmission and prevention.

(5) Principles, techniques, and protocols of hand hygiene, personal protective equipment, surface barriers and disinfection, sterilization, sanitation, and hazardous chemicals associated with infection control.

(6) Principles and protocols of sterilizer monitoring and the proper loading, unloading, storage, and transportation of instruments to work area.

(7) Principles and protocols associated with sharps management.

(8) Principles and protocols of infection control for laboratory areas.

(9) Principles and protocols of waterline maintenance.

(10) Principles and protocols of regulated and nonregulated waste management.
